Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1805.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-7-301.1 of Title 10A, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. “Contracting organization” means an organization which
operates under a written agreement signed between the Office of
Juvenile Affairs and the organization which allows such organization
to provide contract workers, rather than full-time direct-hire
staff, to detention facilities; and
2. “Temporary agency” means a staffing agency, part-time
staffing agency, recruiting agency, or other organization that
provides employees on a temporary basis.
B. No group home, post-adjudication treatment facility, or any
other facility holding youth who are in the custody of the Office of
Juvenile Affairs shall utilize, employ, or enter into an agreement

to staff such detention facility by utilizing a contracting
organization or temporary agency that provides full- or part-time
team members on behalf of the Office on a temporary or contract
basis.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 452.3 of Title 19, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. “Contracting organization” means an organization which
operates under a written agreement signed between the county and the
organization which allows such organization to provide contract
workers, rather than full-time direct-hire staff, to detention
facilities; and
2. “Temporary agency” means a staffing agency, part-time
staffing agency, recruiting agency, or other organization that
provides employees on a temporary basis.
B. No entity that operates a juvenile detention facility shall
utilize, employ, or enter into an agreement to staff such facility
by utilizing a contracting organization or temporary agency that
provides full-time team members to the county on a contract basis.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 530.9 of Title 56, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. “Contracting organization” means an organization which
operates under a written agreement signed between an adult companion
home and the organization which allows such organization to provide
contract workers, rather than full-time direct-hire staff, to the
adult companion home; and
2. “Temporary agency” means a staffing agency, part-time
staffing agency, recruiting agency, or other organization that
provides employees on a temporary basis.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1805 Page 2

B. No adult companion home certified by the Department of Human
Services shall utilize, employ, or enter into an agreement to staff
such detention facility by utilizing a contracting organization or
temporary agency that provides full- or part-time team members to
the Department on a contract basis.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1805 Page 3

Passed the Senate the 11th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 29th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1805 Page 4